New York, session 2025-2026, S9458.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law or any other provision of law to the contrary, Steven Kobie 3 Jackson, who has been continuously employed by the town of Woodstock 4 police department, in the county of Ulster, as a part-time police offi- 5 cer, shall be eligible to take the competitive civil service examination 6 for the position of police officer and shall, contingent upon his score 7 on such examination, be eligible to be placed on the eligible list for 8 appointment as a full-time police officer for the town of Woodstock 9 police department. 10 § 2. Steven Kobie Jackson shall otherwise be subject to the merit and 11 fitness provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time 12 police officers. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15229-01-6